California, session 20252026, AB1725.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1102.151 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1102.151. (a) In addition to any other disclosure required pursuant to this article, the seller of any real property subject to this article, article located in either of the census tracts listed in subdivision (c), or the seller’s agent, shall deliver to the prospective buyer a written disclosure statement describing the presence of active, idle, orphaned, or abandoned wells on or within 300 feet of the property, as identified by the Geologic Energy Management Division’s Well Finder database or any successor database approved by the State Oil and Gas Supervisor. The notice shall include information on the associated hazards of living in close proximity to a well, including any potential health impacts and the increased risk of fire, toxic exposure, and methane gas emergency.(b) For purposes of this section, “well” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3008 of the Public Resources Code.(c) This section shall apply to real property subject to this article that is located in either of the following United States Census Bureau census tracts:(1) United States Census Bureau census tract 06037208001.(2) United States Census Bureau census tract 06037208002.SEC. 2. Section 1940.7.1 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1940.7.1. (a) The landlord of a residential dwelling unit located in either of the census tracts listed in subdivision (c), or their agent shall give written notice to a prospective tenant describing the presence of active, idle, orphaned, or abandoned wells on or within 300 feet of the property, as identified by the Geologic Energy Management Division’s Well Finder database or any successor database approved by the State Oil and Gas Supervisor. The notice shall include information on the associated hazards of living in close proximity to a well, including any potential health impacts and the increased risk of fire, toxic exposure, and methane gas emergency.(b) For purposes of this section, “well” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3008 of the Public Resources Code.(c) This section shall apply to a residential dwelling unit that is located in either of the following United States Census Bureau census tracts:(1) United States Census Bureau census tract 06037208001.(2) United States Census Bureau census tract 06037208002.SEC. 3. Section 17926.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:17926.5. (a) An owner, or an owner’s agent, of a multifamily dwelling unit intended for human occupancy located in either of the census tracts listed in subdivision (e), who rents or leases the dwelling unit to a tenant shall maintain a methane gas monitoring or alarm system in that dwelling unit if the unit is located where active, idle, orphaned, or abandoned wells are on or within 300 feet of the property, as identified by the Geologic Energy Management Division’s Well Finder database or any successor database approved by the State Oil and Gas Supervisor, or where increased levels of methane are likely to be present due to commercial, industrial, geological, or environmental factors.(b) The owner or owner’s agent shall be responsible for ensuring that the methane gas monitoring or alarm system is operational, and that it is inspected, updated, and tested monthly or at the manufacturer’s recommended frequency to ensure that it remains in good working order.(c) The owner or owner’s agent shall periodically submit certification of compliance with this section to the Department of Housing and Community Development or the local housing or building standards enforcement agency.(d) For purposes of this section, “well” has the same meaning as defined in Section 3008 of the Public Resources Code.(e) This section shall apply to a multifamily dwelling unit that is located in either of the following United States Census Bureau census tracts:(1) United States Census Bureau census tract 06037208001.(2) United States Census Bureau census tract 06037208002.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique circumstances present in United States Bureau of the Census census tracts 06037208001 and 06037208002.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.